Massachusetts, session 194th, H2337.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 40 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended in section 4J, in subsection (b), by inserting after the words “building inspection,” the
following:- plumbing inspection, gas fitting inspection,
of 1